Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.050

License and certificate fees.

The fee for original aircraft dealer's license for each calendar year or fraction thereof is seventy-five dollars, which includes one aircraft dealer's certificate and which must be renewed annually for a fee of seventy-five dollars. Additional aircraft dealer certificates may be obtained for ten dollars each per year. If any dealer fails or neglects to apply for renewal of his or her license prior to February 1st in each year, his or her license shall be declared canceled by the secretary, in which case any such dealer desiring a license shall reapply and pay a fee of seventy-five dollars.

[ 2010 c 8 s 5010; 1998 c 187 s 1; 1984 c 7 s 13; 1955 c 150 s 5.]